Utah statutes.
57-3-108.   Financing statements not subject to title.

This title does not apply to a financing statement filed or recorded in a filing office described in Subsection 70A-9a-501(1)(a) that:

(1)  covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut; or

(2) (a)  is filed as a fixture filing; and

(b)  covers goods that are or are to become fixtures.

